Vermont, session 2025-2026, S134.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 24 V.S.A. § 4411 is amended to read:
§ 4411. ZONING BYLAWS
(a) A municipality may regulate land development in conformance with its
adopted municipal plan and for the purposes set forth in section 4302 of this
title to govern the use of land and the placement, spacing, and size of structures
and other factors specified in the bylaws related to public health, safety, or
VT LEG #379209 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.134
2025 Page 2 of 8
welfare. Zoning bylaws may permit, prohibit, restrict, regulate, and determine
land development, including the following:
(1) specific uses of land and shoreland facilities;
(2) dimensions, location, erection, construction, repair, maintenance,
alteration, razing, removal, and use of structures;
(3) areas and dimensions of land to be occupied by uses and structures,
as well as areas, courts, yards, and other open spaces and distances to be left
unoccupied by uses and structures;
(4) timing or sequence of growth, density of population, and intensity of
use;
(5) uses within a river corridor and buffer, as those terms are defined in
10 V.S.A. §§ 1422 and 1427; and
(6) location, construction, repair, maintenance, and alteration of
restricted landing areas as defined in 5 V.S.A. § 202.
* * *
Sec. 2. 10 V.S.A. § 6001 is amended to read:
§ 6001. DEFINITIONS
As used in this chapter:
* * *
(3)(A) “Development” means each of the following:
* * *
VT LEG #379209 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.134
2025 Page 3 of 8
(xiv) The construction of improvements for or operation of a
restricted landing area as defined in 5 V.S.A. § 202.
* * *
Sec. 3. 5 V.S.A. § 205a is added to read:
§ 205a. AVIATION ADVISORY COUNCIL
(a) Creation and purpose.
(1) There is created the Aviation Advisory Council to act as a forum to
discuss and recommend:
(A) Aviation policy that is in the best interests of the residents of
Vermont.
(B) State-owned air navigation facilities use or infrastructure changes
to ensure efficient use of public resources and access to members of the public.
(C) Air navigation facilities use or infrastructure changes to ensure
minimal impact on neighborhoods and natural resources surrounding air
navigation facilities.
(D) State-owned air navigation facility use fees and hangar rental
rates that support the maintenance and operation of State-owned air navigation
facilities.
(E) Practices to reduce the environmental and public health and
safety impacts of air traffic and airport operations and infrastructure.
VT LEG #379209 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.134
2025 Page 4 of 8
(F) Means to support a responsible and healthy aviation community
and industry in Vermont, including protocols to ensure that State-owned air
navigation facilities are available for emergency response and preparedness.
(G) Public safety standards and policies for reducing the impact and
proliferation of private restricted landing areas.
(H) Policies to monitor, prevent, and deter aerial harassment. As
used in this section, “aerial harassment” means using an aircraft to harass
someone by buzzing, flying low, or circling them or their property with the
intent of intimidating or creating distress.
(2) The Council shall encourage and facilitate open communication
between aviators, air navigation facility users, State and local officials, and
members of the public and shall seek to balance the priorities of aviators with
the health and well-being of the general public.
(b) Membership. The Council shall be composed of the following:
(1) the Secretary of Transportation or designee, who shall serve as chair;
(2) the Adjutant General of the Vermont National Guard or designee;
(3) one member representing the aviation industry, appointed by the
Governor;
(4) two members, appointed by the Vermont Association of Planning
and Development Agencies, who shall be members of different regional
planning commissions;
VT LEG #379209 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.134
2025 Page 5 of 8
(5) two members representing independent pilots, appointed by the
Vermont Aviators Association;
(6) one member from a community or neighborhood association
representing the interests and concerns of a community or neighborhood
adjacent to a State-owned air navigation facility, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(7) one member from a community or neighborhood association
representing the interests and concerns of a community or neighborhood
adjacent to a municipal-owned air navigation facility, appointed by the
Committee on Committees;
(8) one member with expertise on the environmental impacts of aviation
who shall not be a member of the aviation industry or Vermont Aviators
Association, appointed by the Speaker of the House; and
(9) one member with expertise on the public health impacts of aviation
who shall not be a member of the aviation industry or Vermont Aviators
Association, appointed by the Committee on Committees.
(c) Assistance. The Council shall have the administrative, technical, and
legal assistance of the Agency of Transportation.
(d) Compensation and reimbursement; annual meetings. Members of the
Council who are not employees of the State of Vermont and who are not
otherwise compensated or reimbursed for their attendance shall be entitled to
VT LEG #379209 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.134
2025 Page 6 of 8
per diem compensation and reimbursement of expenses as permitted under
32 V.S.A. § 1010 for not more than four meetings per year.
(e) Terms. The terms of the members of the Council, other than the terms
of the Secretary of Transportation and the Adjutant General of the Vermont
National Guard, shall be as follows:
(1) initially, members appointed pursuant to subdivisions (b)(3), (7), and
(8) of this section; one member appointed pursuant to subdivision (b)(4) of this
section; and one member appointed pursuant to subdivision (b)(5) of this
section for one year;
(2) initially, members appointed pursuant to subdivisions (b)(6) and (9)
of this section; one member appointed pursuant to subdivision (b)(4) of this
section; and one member appointed pursuant to subdivision (b)(5) of this
section for two years; and
(3) all subsequent appointments except those to the unexpired term of a
former member shall be for a period of two years.
Sec. 4. 5 V.S.A. § 810 is added to read:
§ 810. STATE AIR NAVIGATION FACILITIES; DATA TRACKING
(a) The Agency shall track the date; time; aircraft category or class, as
those are defined in 14 C.F.R. § 1.1, as amended; elevation of aircraft; and
takeoff or landing for every aircraft operation, as defined in 14 C.F.R. § 170.3,
as amended, at a State-owned air navigation facility.
VT LEG #379209 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.134
2025 Page 7 of 8
(b)(1) The Agency shall maintain a web-accessible and web-searchable
data source dedicated to flight data at State-owned air navigation facilities that
shall include the data required to be tracked under subsection (a) of this
section.
(2) The web-accessible and web-searchable data source required under
this subsection shall:
(A) be updated on at least a quarterly basis;
(B) be provided to the municipality where the State-owned air
navigation facility is located on at least a quarterly basis to be maintained at
the municipality’s municipal offices and posted on the municipality’s website,
if a website is maintained; and
(C) include how the data was recorded.
Sec. 5. DATA TRACKING TECHNOLOGY; APPROPRIATION;
IMPLEMENTATION
(a) The sum of $100,000.00 is appropriated from the Transportation
Fund to the Agency of Transportation in fiscal year 2026 for the purpose of
acquiring the technology necessary to perform the data tracking required under
5 V.S.A. § 810, as added by Sec. 4 of this act. Prior to using the funds
appropriated under this section, the Agency shall consult with the Federal
Aviation Administration on whether acquiring the technology necessary to
perform the data tracking required under 5 V.S.A. § 810, as added by Sec. 4 of
VT LEG #379209 v.3

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.134
2025 Page 8 of 8
this act, is eligible for Federal Aviation Administration grant funds and shall
apply for federal grant funds as applicable.
(b) The sum of $91,000.00 is appropriated from the Transportation Fund
to the Agency of Transportation in fiscal year 2026 for the establishment of the
following new permanent full-time classified position: one Airport Data
Technician.
(c) The Agency of Transportation shall commence tracking data as
required under 5 V.S.A. § 810, as added by Sec. 4 of this act, not later than
January 1, 2026.
Sec. 6. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2025.
VT LEG #379209 v.3